Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3810
Coordination of activities; chief executive officer of the department; duties.

The chief executive officer of the department or his or her designee shall meet as necessary with consular officials to discuss, clarify, and coordinate activities, ideas and concerns of a high-profile nature, timely media attention, and joint prevention efforts regarding the protection and well-being of foreign national minors and minors having multiple nationalities and families.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 172;

Laws 2008, LB92, § 10.